Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-390
Horseracing facilities; operation and maintenance; nonprofit corporation; use of revenue.

Any county constructing or acquiring any of the facilities authorized in section 23-389 that include racetrack and horseracing facilities shall be authorized to lease to or enter into an agreement for operation and maintenance of such facilities by a Nebraska nonprofit corporation organized exclusively for civic purposes or which conducts a livestock exposition for the promotion of the livestock or horse-breeding industry of the state and which does not permit its members to derive personal profit from its activities by way of dividends or otherwise. Any such lease or operating agreement shall provide that all revenue derived therefrom shall be used for expenses of operation and maintenance of the facilities, improvements, or additions to such facilities and public works projects within the county.

Laws 1976, LB 519, § 2.